Wyoming statutes. Title 35 Public Health and Safety
Article 1. General Provisions

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2009, ch. 149, § 1, provides:

“(a)
A symposium steering committee is hereby created consisting of one (1) member of the Wyoming house of representatives appointed by the speaker of the house, one (1) member of the Wyoming senate appointed by the president of the senate, one (1) member representing energy producers, one (1) member representing energy consumers and one (1) member representing general business.
The last three (3) members shall be appointed jointly by the president of the senate and the speaker of the house.
The steering committee shall develop plans and funding for a western states energy and environment symposium to be held by November 1, 2010.
The symposium shall be conducted by the University of Wyoming school of energy resources at the direction of the steering committee.
The steering committee shall:

“(i)
Develop plans and funding for the western states energy and environment symposium;

“(ii)
Solicit public and private funding to supplement public funding appropriated under this act for the western states energy and environment symposium;

“(iii)
Invite the following persons or representatives to attend and participate in the western states energy and environment symposium:

“(A)
Select legislators and executive branch members from the governments of the thirteen (13) western states that are members of the council of state governments-west;

“(B)
Experts from all key energy industries;

“(C)
Experts from conservation, environmental and other concerned interest groups;

“(D)
Top experts in the field of energy development, energy use, environment and economics;

“(E)
A representative from state or regional chambers of commerce and business roundtables;

“(F)
A representative from county government and a representative from municipal government from the thirteen (13) western states that are members of the council of state governments-west;

“(G)
Any other persons and representatives of entities or organizations the steering committee may determine have an interest in contributing to or participating in the western states energy and environment symposium, including members of the general public.

“(iv)
Solicit advice and opinions from experts and technical resources on energy development and use, and environmental protection consistent with the purposes of the symposium;

“(v)
Solicit participation by national and regional organizations and think tanks, including but not limited to the energy council, the interstate oil and gas compact commission, the energy foundation, the national conference of state legislatures, the council of state governments-west and the western governors association;

“(vi)
Work to establish a cooperative agreement among the participants to develop a high level cost/benefit economic analysis assessing the challenges of energy development, production, marketing, use and environmental protection within the western states, including an analysis of:

“(A)
Renewable energy development, production and use;

“(B)
Fossil fuel development, production and use;

“(C)
Nuclear energy development, extraction and use;

“(D)
Carbon management and impacts on cost of energy development, production, use and environmental protection;

“(E)
Air quality in the context of energy development, production and use;

“(F)
Projected demands and costs of energy.

“(vii)
Submit a report no later than forty-five (45) days after the symposium adjourns to the legislatures, governors and congressional delegations of participating states and to all participants in the conference.

“(b)
Legislative members assisting the school of energy resources under subsection (a) of this section shall receive salary and reimbursement for per diem and travel expenses incurred in the performance of their duties, as provided in W.S. 28 5 101.

“(c)
The school of energy resources may contract with consultants as necessary to facilitate the western states energy and environment symposium and its purposes.

“(d)
The western states energy and environment symposium may be held within Wyoming or in any other state that may be participating in the symposium.”

Law reviews. —

For article, “Wyoming's Groundwater Laws: Quantity and Quality Regulation,” see XXIV Land & Water L. Rev. 39 (1989).

For article, “Cooperative Ecosystem Management: Can an Ecosystem Approach Succeed in Wyoming?” see XXXII Land & Water L. Rev. 629 (1997).

Library References. —

American Law of Mining, 2nd Edition §
172.03 (Matthew Bender).

§ 35-11-101.
Short title.

This act shall be known and may be cited as the “Wyoming Environmental Quality Act”.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 250, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-502.1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 35-11-103(a)(xiii).

Applied

in

Powder River Basin Res. Council v. Wyo. Dep't of Envtl. Quality, 2010 WY 25, 226 P.3d 809,

2010 Wyo. LEXIS 27

(Mar. 5, 2010).

Cited

in

Board of Trustees v. Spiegel, 549 P.2d 1161,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 191

(Wyo. 1976).

Law reviews. —

For comment on the Wyoming Environmental Quality Act of 1973, see IX Land & Water L. Rev. 65 (1974).

See article, “Federal Mineral Reservations,” X Land & Water L. Rev. 1 (1975).

For article, “Accommodation or Preemption? State and Federal Control of Private Coal Lands in Wyoming,” see XII Land & Water L. Rev. 73 (1977).

For article, “The Emerging Federal Law of Mine Waste: Administrative, Judicial and Legislative Developments,” see XXVI Land & Water L. Rev. 461 (1991).

For case note, “Waiver of Sovereign Immunity—Did Congress Intend to Exempt Federal Facilities From Civil Penalties Under the Clean Water Act? DOE v. Ohio, 503 U.S. 607, 112 S. Ct. 1627, 118 L. Ed. 2d 255, 1992 U.S. LEXIS 2547 (1992),” see XXVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 267 (1993).

For article, “Protecting Wetlands and Reasonable Investment-Backed Expectations in the Wake of Lucas v. South Carolina Coastal Council,” see XXVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 425 (1993).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Common-law strict liability in tort of prior landowner or lessee to subsequent owner for contamination of land with hazardous waste resulting from prior owner's or lessee's abnormally dangerous or ultrahazardous activity, 13 ALR5th 600.

Propriety of negotiated settlements in government cleanup actions under federal hazardous waste statutes, 114 ALR Fed 1.

Federal requirements for public participation in adoption, submission, and approval of state implementation plans and revisions pursuant to § 110 of Clean Air Act (42 USC § 7410) 151 ALR Fed 445.

Decisions of Environmental Protection Agency (EPA) approving or disapproving state implementation plans as interfering with primary role of states to determine how national ambient air quality standards should be met under Clean Air Act (42 USC §§ 7401 et seq.) 151 ALR Fed 495.

Supreme Court's views as to validity, construction and application of Comprehensive Environmental Response, Compensation, and Liability Act ((CERCLA) (42 U.S.C. §§ 9601 et seq.)), 157 ALR Fed 291.

Requirement that there be continuing violation to maintain citizen suit under federal environmental protection statutes — post-Gwaltney cases, 158 ALR Fed 519.

What are “navigable waters” subject to Federal Water Pollution Control Act (33 U.S.C. §§ 1251 et seq.), 160 ALR Fed 585.

Amount and characteristics of wastes as equitable factors in allocation of response costs pursuant to § 113(f)(1) of Comprehensive Environmental Response, Compensation, and Liability Act (CERCLA), 42 U.S.C. § 9613(f)(1): multiple waste streams, 162 ALR Fed 371.

§ 35-11-102.
Policy and purpose.

Whereas pollution of the air, water and land of this state will imperil public health and welfare, create public or private nuisances, be harmful to wildlife, fish and aquatic life, and impair domestic, agricultural, industrial, recreational and other beneficial uses; it is hereby declared to be the policy and purpose of this act to enable the state to prevent, reduce and eliminate pollution; to preserve, and enhance the air, water and reclaim the land of Wyoming; to plan the development, use, reclamation, preservation and enhancement of the air, land and water resources of the state; to preserve and exercise the primary responsibilities and rights of the state of Wyoming; to retain for the state the control over its air, land and water and to secure cooperation between agencies of the state, agencies of other states, interstate agencies, and the federal government in carrying out these objectives.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 250, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-502.2; Laws 1977, ch. 132, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 35-11-103(a)(xiii).

State land preservation and enhancement account. —

Laws 2005, ch. 85, § 1, creates account for state land preservation and enhancement. The act appropriates $750,000 from the school foundation program account to the office of state lands and investments to be deposited in the new account. Funds in the state land preservation and enhancement account are to be used by the office of state lands and investments to fund projects that preserve and enhance the asset value of all surface and mineral lands held in trust by the state. The director of the office of state lands and investments is to report on the use and expenditure of the fund not later than October 1 of each year to the joint agriculture, public lands and water resources, joint education and the joint appropriations interim committees.

Laws 2005, ch. 85, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 24, 2005.

Task force. —

Laws 2005, ch. 125, § 1, directs the state health officer and the department of health in collaboration with the Wyoming department of agriculture and the Wyoming department of environmental quality to convene a multi-disciplinary task force to conduct a study of environmental health issues currently identified, the state and federal agencies to whom those issues are currently assigned and those environmental health threats identified but not clearly assigned to a particular state agency. The study is to examine overlapping governmental jurisdiction and jurisdictional gaps in environmental health matters and, to the extent needed, recommend solutions to these problems. The department is to produce and submit a comprehensive plan to coordinate and clarify agency responsibility for environmental health issues, together with recommendations for any initial legislation, to the joint labor, health and social services interim committee by November 15, 2005. The act appropriates $50,000 from the general fund to the department of health to implement the purposes of this act and further provides that the department of health may use existing resources and apply for any federal or private grants that may be available to augment funding for the required study and plan.

Laws 2005, ch. 125, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as required by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 25, 2005.

Environmental protection statutes are entitled to liberal construction

since their goal is public protection. People v. Platte Pipe Line Co., 649 P.2d 208,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 368

(Wyo. 1982).

Legal obligation of environmental quality council. —

The legal obligation imposed on the council by the legislature is to promulgate rules and regulations necessary to prevent, reduce and eliminate pollution. Tri-State Generation & Transmission Ass'n v. Environmental Quality Council, 590 P.2d 1324,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 369

(Wyo. 1979).

Application to preexisting operations. —

The reclamation requirements of this chapter apply to preexisting operations which were not completed or substantially completed prior to this chapter's enactment. Universal Equip. Co. v. State, 839 P.2d 967,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 152

(Wyo. 1992).

Quoted

in

Rocky Mt. Oil & Gas Ass'n v. State, 645 P.2d 1163,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 345

(Wyo. 1982).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Industrial Siting Legislation: The Wyoming Industrial Development Information and Siting Act — Advance or Retreat?” see XI Land & Water L. Rev. 27 (1976).

For case note, “Environmental Law — Strict Liability for Oil Spills in Wyoming. People v. Platte Pipe Line Company, 649 P.2d 208,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 368

(Wyo. 1982),” see XVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 805 (1983).

For comment, “Hazardous Waste Cleanup in Wyoming: Legal Tools Available to the Private Citizen,” see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 395 (1984).

For case note, “Administrative Law—Broader Jurisdiction for the Wyoming Oil and Gas Conservation Commission. Gulf Oil Corp. v. Wyoming Oil & Gas Conservation Comm'n, 693 P.2d 227,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 422

(Wyo. 1985),” see XXI Land & Water L. Rev. 69 (1986).

For comment, “State Participation in Federal Policy Making for the Yellowstone Ecosystem: A Meaningful Solution or Business as Usual?” see XXI Land & Water L. Rev. 397 (1986).

For case note, “Mining Law — Are Surface Lessees ‘Surface Owners’ Entitled to Protection of Consent and Bonding Provisions of Wyoming's Environmental Quality Act? Belle Fourche Pipeline Co. v. State, 766 P.2d 537,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 175

(Wyo. 1988),” see XXV Land & Water L. Rev. 447 (1990).